Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.10.577

Opioid overdose reversal medication—Administration—Training—Assistance with grants and donations.

(1) For the purposes of this section:

(a) "Opioid overdose reversal medication" has the meaning provided in RCW 69.41.095; and

(b) "Opioid-related overdose" has the meaning provided in RCW 69.41.095.

(2) By the beginning of the 2019-20 academic year, a public institution of higher education with a residence hall housing at least one hundred students must develop a plan: (a) For the maintenance and administration of opioid overdose reversal medication in and around the residence hall; and (b) for the training of designated personnel to administer opioid overdose reversal medication to respond to symptoms of an opioid-related overdose. The training may utilize free online training resources including, but not limited to, the free online training resources identified as appropriate for public schools in RCW 28A.210.395. The plan may identify: The ratio of residents to opioid overdose reversal medication doses; the designated trained personnel, who may include residence hall advisers; and whether the designated trained personnel covers more than one residence hall.

(3) The state board for community and technical colleges shall assist an individual community or technical college with applying for grants or donations to obtain opioid overdose reversal medication at no cost or at a discount.

[ 2019 c 314 s 43.]

NOTES:

Declaration—2019 c 314: See note following RCW 18.22.810.